Utah statutes.
70A-2a-307.   Priority of liens arising by attachment or levy on, security
interests in, and other claims to goods.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-2a-306, a creditor of a
lessee takes subject to the lease contract.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3)  and in Sections 70A-
2a-306 and 70A-2a-308, a creditor of a lessor takes subject to the lease
contract unless the creditor holds a lien that attached to the goods before
the lease contract became enforceable.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 70A-9a-317, 70A-9a-321, and 70A-
9a-323, a lessee takes a leasehold interest subject to a security interest
held by a creditor of the lessor.
